South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4593.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 9-1-1790 (C) and (D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) A retired member shall pay to the system the employee contribution as if the member were an active contributing member if an employer participating in the system employs the retired member.  The retired member does not accrue additional service credit in the system by reason of the contributions required pursuant to this subsection and subsection (B) of this section. (D)(C) A retired member of the South Carolina Retirement System who is not a member of the Police Officers Retirement System, but is employed in a position that would otherwise be covered by the Police Officers Retirement System, shall not join the Police Officers Retirement System but, notwithstanding any other provision of law, that member is deemed a retired contributing member of the South Carolina Retirement System and shall remit the employee contributions required under subsection (C) of this section to the South Carolina Retirement System and the employer shall remit to the South Carolina Retirement System the employer contribution required by subsection (B). An employer who hires a retiree of the South Carolina Retirement System pursuant to this subsection shall elect to participate as an employer in the South Carolina Retirement System. SECTION 2.  Section 9-11-90(4)(c) and (d) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (c) A retired member shall pay to the system the employee contribution as if the member were an active contributing member if an employer participating in the system employs the retired member.  The retired member does not accrue additional service credit in the system by reason of the contributions required pursuant to this item and item (b) of this subsection. (d)(c) A retired member of the Police Officers Retirement System who is not a member of the South Carolina Retirement System, but is employed in a position that would otherwise be covered by the South Carolina Retirement System, shall not join the South Carolina Retirement System but, notwithstanding any other provision of law, that member is deemed a retired contributing member of the Police Officers Retirement System and shall remit the employee contributions required under item (c) of this subsection to the Police Officers Retirement System and the employer shall remit to the Police Officers Retirement System the employer contribution required by item (b). An employer who hires a retiree of the Police Officers Retirement System pursuant to this subsection shall elect to participate as an employer in the Police Officers Retirement System. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----